Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 24
COLORADO ADVISORY COUNCIL FOR
PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES

26-24-101 to 26-24-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article repealed, (HB 20-1392), ch. 132, p. 575, § 1, effective June 26.

Editor's note:

This article 24 was added in 2018 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2020. For the text of this article 24 prior to 2020, consult the 2019 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.